Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 3. Foreign Personal Representatives

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

31 Am. Jur. 2d Executors and Administrators §§ 844 to 846.

34 C.J.S. Executors and Administrators §§ 931 to 933.

§ 2-11-301.
Naming of executors and trustees; generally; appointment of agents for service; bond when executor sole legatee; applicability of provisions.

The testator may name in his will as executor or trustee any person or persons who are residents and citizens of the United States, or any bank or trust company organized under the laws of this state or of the United States and doing business in this state. When it appears to the court having jurisdiction that any individual named as an executor or trustee in any will is not a resident of this state or that any bank or trust company named as executor or trustee is not authorized to do business in this state, the court shall require the executor or trustee to designate a resident, bank or trust company of this state as agent or attorney upon whom any order, notice or process issued out of the courts of this state may be served. Service on the agent or attorney has the same effect as if served upon the nonresident executor or trustee in person. If any nonresident executor or trustee fails to appoint an agent or attorney, the court shall revoke his authority to act. When the person named as executor is also the sole legatee, instead of the bond required by other provisions herein of an executor, he may give a bond to the state in a sum and with sureties the court requires, conditioned only to pay within the time fixed by the court all the debts of the testator which are filed or exhibited within the time fixed by the notice to creditors. He shall return an inventory and appraisement as in other cases. Upon execution and approval of the bond, the filing of the inventory and appraisement and the publication of notice to creditors, the estate of the testator vests absolutely in the sole legatee and the debts of the testator so filed or exhibited become charges against the legatee. Upon breach of the condition of the bond, suit may be instituted on the bond by any creditor in the name of the state for the use of the creditor. The provisions hereof apply to all wills hereafter admitted to probate.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 107, § 6; 1886, ch. 4, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1887, § 2239; R.S. 1899, § 4570; C.S. 1910, § 5399; C.S. 1920, § 6672; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 119; R.S. 1931, §§ 88-106, 88-107; C.S. 1945, § 6-307; W.S. 1957, § 2-52; W.S. 1977, §

2-4-106

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1982, ch. 74, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section appeared as R.S. 1931 as §§ 88-106 and 88-107. Prior to that time it had been enacted and compiled as a single section, and it has been compiled again as a single section since then in C.S. 1945, W.S. 1957 and W.S. 1977.

Nonresident may act as executor. —

Under this section, notwithstanding the fact that §

2-4-203

expressly requires administrators to be bona fide residents of the state, it was held that a nonresident may qualify and act as an executor. Hecht v. Carey, 13 Wyo. 154, 78 P. 705,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1904).

And cannot be removed unless he permanently absents himself.—

Where nonresident is appointed as executor, and personally submits to jurisdiction of the court and personally conducts settlement of the estate, he cannot be removed from office on ground of his nonresidence unless he subsequently permanently “removes” from the state, in sense of permanently absenting himself from place where business of his trust is transacted, or withdrawing himself beyond process of the court. Rice v. Tilton, 13 Wyo. 420, 80 P. 828,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1905).

Presumption against nonresidency. —

Failure to comply with this section leaves a presumption against nonresidency. State ex rel. Sheehan v. District Court, 426 P.2d 431,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1967).

Liability on bond for testator's debt incurred as surety. —

An executrix who gives bond to “faithfully discharge all of the just debts and obligations” of testator will be liable for misapplication of funds by an official on whose bond testator was surety, though such misapplication occurred after executrix had given her bond. Snyder v. State, 5 Wyo. 318, 40 P. 441,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1895).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Delegation by will of power to nominate executor, 11 ALR2d 1284.

Adverse interest or position as disqualification for appointment as personal representative, 18 ALR2d 633.

Effect of divorce, separation, desertion, unfaithfulness and the like, upon right to administer upon the estate of spouse, 34 ALR2d 876.

Separation agreement as affecting right of husband or wife to administer deceased spouse's estate, 34 ALR2d 1020, 34 ALR2d 1039.

Loss of right to be appointed executor by delay in presenting will for probate or in seeking letters testamentary, 45 ALR2d 916.

Testamentary gift to one named as executor or trustee as conditioned upon his qualifying or serving as such, 61 ALR2d 1380.

Capacity of infant to act as executor or administrator and effect of improper appointment, 8 ALR3d 590.

Eligibility of foreign corporation for appointment as executor or administrator, 26 ALR3d 1019.

Eligibility of foreign corporation to appointment as executor, administrator or testamentary trustee, 26 ALR3d 1019.

Physical condition as affecting competency to act as executor or administrator, 47 ALR3d 1078.

Physical condition as affecting competency to act as executor or administrator, 71 ALR3d 675.

Propriety of court's appointment, as administrator of decedent's estate, of stranger rather than person having statutory preference, 84 ALR3d 707.

§ 2-11-302.
Naming of executors and trustees; powers; generally.

A domiciliary foreign personal representative who has complied with W.S.

2-11-301

may exercise as to assets in this state all powers of a local personal representative and may maintain actions and proceedings in this state subject to any conditions imposed upon nonresident parties generally.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-11-303.
Naming of executors and trustees; limitations.

The power of a domiciliary foreign personal representative under W.S.

2-11-302

shall be exercised only if there is no administration or application therefor pending in this state. A petition for local administration of the estate terminates the power of the foreign personal representative to act under W.S.

2-11-302

but the local court may allow the foreign personal representative to exercise limited powers to preserve the estate. No person who before receiving actual notice of a pending local administration has changed his position in reliance upon the powers of a foreign personal representative shall be prejudiced by reason of the petition for or grant of local administration. The local personal representative is subject to all duties and obligations which have accrued by virtue of the exercise of the powers by the foreign personal representative and may be substituted for him in any action or proceedings in this state.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.